District of Columbia statutes.
7-2305

Regulations; recommendation of legislation.

In addition to disaster prevention measures included in District of Columbia government and interjurisdictional public emergency plans, to prevent or manage the harmful consequences of a disaster, and consistent with the provisions of other law, the Mayor shall, when appropriate, issue regulations or recommend legislation to the Council of the District of Columbia relating to flood plain management, stream encroachment and flow regulation, weather modification, fire prevention and control, air quality, public works, land use, land use planning, and construction standards.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-149, § 6, 27 DCR 4886
1981 Ed., § 6-1505.